Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1862
Duplicative gas mains or services; prohibited.

A metropolitan utilities district or jurisdictional utility shall not extend duplicative or redundant interior natural gas mains or natural gas services into a subdivision, whether residential, commercial, or industrial, which has existing natural gas utility infrastructure or which has contracted for natural gas utility infrastructure with another utility.

Laws 1999, LB 78, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2004), § 57-1305;

Laws 2006, LB 1249, § 9.